test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-niska_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - niska - ok : # -m animate noun, Canada goose, acc. Wolvengrey
     niska+N+AN+Sg: niska
     niska+N+AN+Pl: niskak
     niska+N+AN+Loc: niskinâhk
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: niskisis # also niskisis
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: niskisisak # also niskisisak

     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niniskim
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiniskim
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: oniskima
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: oniskimiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niniskiminân
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiniskiminaw
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiniskimiwâw
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: oniskimiwâwa
     niska+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: oniskimiyiwa

     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niniskimak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiniskimak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: oniskima
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: oniskimiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niniskiminânak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiniskiminawak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiniskimiwâwak
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: oniskimiwâwa
     niska+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: oniskimiyiwa

     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: niniskimisis
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kiniskimisis
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: oniskimisisa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: oniskimisisiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: niniskimisisinân
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kiniskimisisinaw
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kiniskimisisiwâw
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: oniskimisisiwâwa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: oniskimisisiyiwa
 
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: niniskimisisak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kiniskimisisak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: oniskimisisa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: oniskimisisiyiwa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: niniskimisisinânak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kiniskimisisinawak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kiniskimisisiwâwak
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: oniskimisisiwâwa
     niska+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: oniskimisisiyiwa
     
